California, session 20252026, AB1844.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 75522 of the Government Code is amended to read:75522. (a) A judge is eligible to retire pursuant to this section upon attaining both 65 years of age and 20 or more years of service, or upon attaining 70 years of age with a minimum of five years of service.(b) The office of a judge who retires under this section becomes vacant on the date of the retirement.(c) A judge who retires pursuant to this section shall, within 30 days after the effective date of the retirement, elect to receive either the benefits provided by subdivision (d) or the benefits provided by subdivision (e). Under rules adopted by the board, the time for the election may be extended in cases of illness or other hardship, but once made, the election shall be final and irrevocable.(d) The judge may elect to receive for life a monthly retirement allowance equal to the benefit factor multiplied by the judge’s final compensation multiplied by the number of years of service credit.(1) The benefit factor for a judge eligible to retire pursuant to this section equals 3.75 percent per year of service.(2) In no event shall the retirement allowance at the time of retirement exceed 75 percent of the judge’s final compensation.(e) The judge may elect to receive the amount of his or her their monetary credits determined pursuant to Section 75520, including the credits added under subdivision (b) of that section computed to the last day of the month preceding the date of distribution. Under rules adopted by the board, the judge may elect to receive that amount in a single payment, or may direct that it be paid in an annuity of actuarially equivalent value for the judge’s life or in one of the optional forms provided for in Section 75571 if the judge retires on or before December 31, 2017, or Section 75571.5 if the judge retires on or after January 1, 2018. during the period beginning on January 1, 2018, and ending on December 31, 2026, or Section 75571.7 if the judge retires on or after January 1, 2027.(f) If a retired judge fails or refuses to make an election pursuant to subdivision (c) within the time allowed, he or she the judge shall be deemed to have elected to receive a monthly retirement allowance under subdivision (d).SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 75522.5 of the Government Code is amended to read:75522.5. (a) On and after January 1, 2024, a judge who is not eligible to retire pursuant to Section 75522, in lieu of receiving their monetary credits pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 75521, may elect to retire pursuant to this section, notwithstanding Section 7522.44, upon satisfying the eligibility requirements of this section. Retirement pursuant to this section shall be considered a service retirement for the purposes of Section 75580.5.(b) A judge is eligible to retire pursuant to this section upon attaining both 60 years of age and 15 years or more of service, or upon attaining 65 years of age with a minimum of 10 years of service.(c) The office of a judge who retires under this section becomes vacant on the date of retirement.(d) (1) A judge who elects to retire pursuant to this section shall, within 30 days after the effective date of the retirement, elect to receive one of the benefits provided under subdivision (f). Under rules adopted by the board, the time for the election may be extended in cases of illness or other hardship, but once made, the election shall be final and irrevocable.(2) If a retired judge fails or refuses to make an election pursuant to subdivision (f) within the time allowed, the retired judge shall be deemed to have elected to receive a monthly allowance under paragraph (1) of subdivision (f).(e) For purposes of this section, “full retirement age” means the age and years of service at which a judge would have become eligible to retire under Section 75522 if the judge had continued to accrue years of service credit rather than retire pursuant to this section.(f) Subject to the limits described in subdivision (g), a judge who elects to retire under this section shall receive, for life, a monthly retirement allowance equal to the applicable benefit factor multiplied by the judge’s final compensation multiplied by the number of years of service credit, pursuant to one of the following paragraphs:(1) This paragraph shall apply to the retirement allowance of a judge who retires prior to full retirement age and who defers to full retirement age. The benefit factor for a judge electing to retire pursuant to this paragraph shall be a percentage equal to 3.75 reduced by 0.07 for each year, taken to the preceding completed quarter year, the judge’s date of retirement is prior to the judge’s full retirement age.(2) This paragraph shall apply to the retirement allowance of a judge who retires prior to full retirement age and who defers past full retirement age. The retirement allowance shall commence on the date the judge attains full retirement age plus an additional 0.22 years for each year the judge’s date of retirement is prior to the judge’s full retirement age. The benefit factor for a judge electing to retire pursuant to this paragraph equals 3.75 percent.(g) (1) In no event shall the retirement allowance under this section calculated at the time of retirement exceed 75 percent of the judge’s final compensation.(2) The calculation of the retirement allowance under this section shall not include more than 20 years of service.(h) A monthly allowance or optional settlement payable under this chapter to a surviving spouse or a designated beneficiary of a judge who elected to retire pursuant to this section, and who died before receiving a retirement allowance, shall begin the date the judge would have been eligible to receive a retirement allowance under this section and shall continue until the death of the surviving spouse or the designated beneficiary.(i) This section shall only apply to judges who retire pursuant to this section before January 1, 2029.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. Section 75570 of the Government Code is amended to read:75570. (a) In lieu of electing the unmodified allowance for the judge’s life alone, a judge who elects to retire and receive a monthly allowance under either subdivision (d) of Section 75522 or Section 75522.5 may elect, on or before the date of retirement, to have the actuarial equivalent of the judge’s retirement allowance as of the date of retirement applied to a lesser retirement allowance, in accordance with one of the optional settlements specified in Section 75571 if the judge retires on or before December 31, 2017, or Section 75571.5 if the judge retires on or after January 1, 2018. during the period beginning on January 1, 2018, and ending on December 31, 2026, or Section 75571.7 if the judge retires on or after January 1, 2027.(b) That election, revocation, or change of election shall be made by a writing filed with the system within 30 calendar days after the making of the first payment on account of any retirement allowance.(c) If there is a survivor spouse who would qualify for the survivor allowance under subdivision (b) (c) or (d) of Section 75590, then the election, with respect to any optional settlement other than the optional settlement in subdivision (a) of Section 75571 or 75571, subdivision (b) of Section 75571.5, or subdivision (b) of Section 75571.7, shall apply only to the portion of the retirement allowance that exceeds the amount of the allowance deemed payable to the survivor. surviving spouse.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. Section 75570.5 of the Government Code is amended to read:75570.5. If a judge elects an optional settlement that provides for a monthly allowance for their surviving spouse or their named beneficiary or beneficiaries, the combined allowance payable to the surviving spouse or the named beneficiary or beneficiaries pursuant to the optional settlement and to the surviving spouse pursuant to Section 75590, if applicable, cannot exceed the amount of the judge’s monthly allowance.SEC. 4.SEC. 5. Section 75571.5 of the Government Code is amended to read:75571.5. This section shall apply to any judge who retires on or after January 1, 2018. during the period beginning on January 1, 2018, and ending on December 31, 2026.(a) The unmodified allowance consists of the right to have the maximum retirement allowance paid to the judge for the judge’s life alone. A continuing allowance to a beneficiary, surviving spouse, other than the benefit provided in subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 75590, is not provided and there is not a return of unused accumulated contributions after the death of the judge.(b) The Return of Remaining Contributions Option 1 consists of the right to have a retirement allowance paid to the judge for the judge’s life alone and if the judge dies before the judge receives in annuity payments the amount of the judge’s accumulated contributions at retirement, to have the balance at death paid to the judge’s surviving spouse, or if none, to the judge’s designated beneficiary, or if none, to the judge’s estate.(c) (1) The 100 Percent Beneficiary Option 2 consists of the right to have a retirement allowance paid to the judge until the judge’s death and thereafter to have the same monthly allowance paid to the judge’s designated beneficiary surviving spouse for life, provided that, with respect to a judge subject to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 75590, the designated beneficiary surviving spouse shall receive that portion of the judge’s monthly allowance that exceeds the amount of the allowance deemed payable pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 75590.(2) Upon the death of both the judge and the						designated beneficiary, surviving spouse, any remaining balance of the judge’s accumulated contributions at retirement not used to fund the allowances paid to the judge and the designated beneficiary surviving spouse pursuant to this subdivision will be paid in a lump sum to the second designated beneficiary of the deceased, or if none, to the estate of the deceased.(d) (1) The 100 Percent Beneficiary Option 2 with Benefit Allowance Increase consists of the right to have a retirement allowance paid to the judge until the judge’s death and thereafter to have the same monthly allowance paid to the judge’s designated beneficiary surviving spouse for life; provided that with respect to a judge subject to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 75590, the designated beneficiary surviving spouse shall receive that portion of the judge’s monthly allowance that exceeds the amount of the allowance deemed payable pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 75590.(2) If the judge’s designated beneficiary spouse predeceases the judge and the judge elected this optional settlement, the judge’s allowance shall be adjusted effective the first day of the month following the death of the designated beneficiary spouse to reflect the benefit that would have been paid had the judge not elected an optional settlement.(3) If the designated beneficiary is a spouse and the marriage of a retired judge is dissolved or a legal separation filed, and the judgment dividing the community property between the judge and the designated beneficiary surviving spouse awards the total interest in this system to the retired judge, or the marriage is annulled and confirmed by a court, the retired judge’s allowance shall be adjusted effective the first day of the month following the filing of the judgment with the board to reflect the benefit that would have been paid had the judge not elected an optional settlement.(e) (1) The 50 Percent Beneficiary Option 3 consists of the right to have a retirement allowance paid to the judge until the judge’s death and thereafter to have one-half of the monthly allowance paid to the judge’s designated beneficiary surviving spouse for life; provided that with respect to a judge subject to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 75590, the designated beneficiary surviving spouse shall receive one-half of that portion of the judge’s monthly allowance that exceeds the amount of the allowance deemed payable pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 75590.(2) Upon the death of both the judge and the	designated beneficiary, surviving spouse, any remaining balance of the judge’s accumulated contributions at retirement not used to fund the allowances paid to the judge and the designated beneficiary surviving spouse pursuant to this subdivision will be paid in a lump sum to the second designated beneficiary of the deceased, or if none, to the estate of the deceased.(f) (1) The 50 Percent Beneficiary Option 3 with Benefit Allowance Increase consists of the right to have a retirement allowance paid to the judge until the judge’s death and thereafter to have one-half of the monthly allowance paid to the judge’s						designated beneficiary surviving spouse for life; provided that with respect to a judge subject to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 75590, the designated beneficiary surviving spouse shall receive one-half of that portion of the judge’s monthly allowance that exceeds the amount of the allowance deemed payable pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 75590.(2) If the judge’s designated beneficiary spouse predeceases the judge and the judge elected this optional settlement, the judge’s allowance shall be adjusted effective the first day of the month following the death of the designated beneficiary spouse to reflect the benefit that would have been paid had the judge not elected an optional settlement.(3) If the designated beneficiary is a spouse and the marriage of a retired judge is dissolved or a legal separation filed, and the judgment dividing the community property between the judge and the designated beneficiary surviving spouse awards the total interest in this system to the retired judge, or the marriage is annulled and confirmed by a court, the retired judge’s allowance shall be adjusted effective the first day of the month following the filing of the judgment with the board to reflect the benefit that would have been paid had the judge not elected an optional settlement.(g) The Flexible Beneficiary Option 4 consists of the right to have a retirement allowance paid to a judge until the judge’s death, and thereafter to have a monthly allowance paid to the judge’s designated beneficiary or beneficiaries surviving spouse for life. Subject to Section 75570.5, the judge may select the monthly allowance payable to the designated beneficiary or beneficiaries surviving spouse from the options below:(1) Specific Dollar Amount to a Beneficiary or Beneficiaries. Surviving Spouse. The judge may specify that upon the judge’s death after retirement, a monthly allowance in an amount determined by the judge be paid to a designated beneficiary or beneficiaries the judge’s surviving spouse for life.(2) Specific Percentage to a Beneficiary or Beneficiaries. Surviving Spouse. The judge may specify that upon the judge’s death after retirement, a monthly allowance in an amount equivalent to a specified percentage of the judge’s allowance be paid to a designated beneficiary or beneficiaries the judge’s surviving spouse for life.SEC. 6. Section 75571.7 is added to the Government Code, to read:75571.7. This section applies to any judge who retires on or after January 1, 2027.(a) The unmodified allowance consists of the right to have the maximum retirement allowance paid to the judge for the judge’s life alone. A continuing allowance to a designated beneficiary, other than the benefit provided in subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 75590, is not provided and there is not a return of unused accumulated contributions after the death of the judge.(b) The Return of Remaining Contributions Option 1 consists of the right to have a retirement allowance paid to the judge for the judge’s life alone and if the judge dies before the judge receives in annuity payments the amount of the judge’s accumulated contributions at retirement, to have the balance at death paid to the judge’s designated beneficiary, or if none, to the judge’s estate.(c) (1) The 100 Percent Beneficiary Option 2 consists of the right to have a retirement allowance paid to the judge until the judge’s death and thereafter to have the same monthly allowance paid to the judge’s designated beneficiary for life; provided that with respect to a judge subject to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 75590, the designated beneficiary shall receive a monthly allowance equal to that portion of the judge’s monthly allowance that exceeds the amount of the allowance deemed payable pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 75590.(2) Upon the death of both the judge and the designated beneficiary, any remaining balance of the judge’s accumulated contributions at retirement not used to fund the allowances paid to the judge and the designated beneficiary pursuant to this subdivision will be paid in a lump sum to the secondary beneficiary or beneficiaries designated by the judge.(d) (1) The 100 Percent Beneficiary Option 2 with Benefit Allowance Increase consists of the right to have a retirement allowance paid to the judge until the judge’s death and thereafter to have the same monthly allowance paid to the judge’s designated beneficiary for life; provided that with respect to a judge subject to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 75590, the designated beneficiary shall receive a monthly allowance equal to that portion of the judge’s monthly allowance that exceeds the amount of the allowance deemed payable pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 75590.(2) If the judge’s designated beneficiary predeceases the judge and the judge elected this optional settlement, the judge’s allowance shall be adjusted effective the first day of the month following the death of the designated beneficiary to reflect the benefit that would have been paid had the judge not elected an optional settlement.(3) If the designated beneficiary is a spouse and the marriage of a retired judge is dissolved or a legal separation filed, and the judgment dividing the community property between the judge and the designated beneficiary awards the total interest in this system to the retired judge, or the marriage is annulled and confirmed by a court, the retired judge’s allowance shall be adjusted effective the first day of the month following the filing of the judgment with the board to reflect the benefit that would have been paid had the judge not elected an optional settlement.(4) If a nonspouse beneficiary waives entitlement to this allowance, the judge’s allowance shall be adjusted effective the first day of the month following the receipt of the waiver of the allowance entitlement from the nonspouse beneficiary to reflect the benefit that would have been paid had the judge not selected an optional settlement.(5) Nothing in this subdivision shall result in additional cost to the employer.(e) (1) The 50 Percent Beneficiary Option 3 consists of the right to have a retirement allowance paid to the judge until the judge’s death and thereafter to have one-half of the monthly allowance paid to the judge’s designated beneficiary for life; provided that with respect to a judge subject to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 75590, the designated beneficiary shall receive a monthly allowance equal to one-half of that portion of the judge’s monthly allowance that exceeds the amount of the allowance deemed payable pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 75590.(2) Upon the death of both the judge and the designated beneficiary, any remaining balance of the judge’s accumulated contributions at retirement not used to fund the allowances paid to the judge and the designated beneficiary pursuant to this subdivision will be paid in a lump sum to the secondary beneficiary or beneficiaries designated by the judge.(f) (1) The 50 Percent Beneficiary Option 3 with Benefit Allowance Increase consists of the right to have a retirement allowance paid to the judge until the judge’s death and thereafter to have one-half of the monthly allowance paid to the judge’s designated beneficiary for life; provided that with respect to a judge subject to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 75590, the designated beneficiary shall receive a monthly allowance equal to one-half of that portion of the judge’s monthly allowance that exceeds the amount of the allowance deemed payable pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 75590.(2) If the judge’s designated beneficiary predeceases the judge and the judge elected this optional settlement, the judge’s allowance shall be adjusted effective the first day of the month following the death of the designated beneficiary to reflect the benefit that would have been paid had the judge not elected an optional settlement.(3) If the designated beneficiary is a spouse and the marriage of a retired judge is dissolved or a legal separation filed, and the judgment dividing the community property between the judge and the designated beneficiary awards the total interest in this system to the retired judge, or the marriage is annulled and confirmed by a court, the retired judge’s allowance shall be adjusted effective the first day of the month following the filing of the judgment with the board to reflect the benefit that would have been paid had the judge not elected an optional settlement.(4) If a nonspouse beneficiary waives entitlement to this allowance, the judge’s allowance shall be adjusted effective the first day of the month following the receipt of the waiver of the allowance entitlement from the nonspouse beneficiary to reflect the benefit that would have been paid had the judge not selected an optional settlement.(5) Nothing in this subdivision shall result in additional cost to the employer.(g) The Flexible Beneficiary Option 4 consists of the right to have a retirement allowance paid to a judge until the judge’s death, and thereafter to have a monthly allowance paid to the judge’s designated beneficiary or beneficiaries for life. Subject to Section 75570.5, the judge may select the monthly allowance payable to the designated beneficiary or beneficiaries from the options below:(1) Specific Dollar Amount to a Beneficiary or Beneficiaries. The judge may specify that upon the judge’s death after retirement, a monthly allowance in an amount determined by the judge be paid to a designated beneficiary or beneficiaries for life.(2) Specific Percentage to a Beneficiary or Beneficiaries. The judge may specify that upon the judge’s death after retirement, a monthly allowance in an amount equivalent to a specified percentage of the judge’s allowance be paid to a designated beneficiary or beneficiaries for life.SEC. 5.SEC. 7. Section 75574 is added to the Government Code, to read:75574. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a judge may, at any time prior to or after reaching retirement age consistent with Section 75522 or 75522.5, as applicable, designate a beneficiary to receive the benefits as may be payable to their beneficiary under this article, by a signed writing filed with the board.(b) A designation shall not be made in derogation of the community property share of any nonmember spouse when any benefit is derived, in whole or in part, from community property contributions or service credited during the period of marriage, unless the nonmember spouse has previously obtained an alternative order for division pursuant to Section 2610 of the Family Code.(c) The designation, subject to conditions imposed by board rule, may be by class, in which case the members of the class at the time of the judge’s death shall be entitled as beneficiaries. The designation shall also be subject to the board’s conclusive determination, upon evidence satisfactory to it, of the existence, identity, or other facts relating to entitlement of any person designated as beneficiary, and payment made by this system in reliance on any determination made in good faith, notwithstanding that it may not have discovered a beneficiary otherwise entitled to share in the benefit, shall constitute a complete discharge and release of this system for further liability for the benefit.SEC. 6.SEC. 8. Section 75590 of the Government Code is amended to read:75590. (a) A surviving designated beneficiary spouse of a judge who was eligible to retire pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 75522 shall, within 90 days after the judge’s death, elect to receive either of the following:(1) A monthly retirement allowance equal to one-half of the judge’s benefit factor computed as stated in subdivision (d) of Section 75522 as of the date of death, multiplied by the judge’s final compensation multiplied by the number of years of service credit. This allowance shall be adjusted for changes in the cost of living as provided in Section 75523.(2) The judge’s monetary credits determined pursuant to Section 75520, including the credits added under subdivision (b) of that section computed to the last day of the month preceding the date of distribution.(b) On and after January 1, 2024, a surviving designated beneficiary spouse of a judge who was not eligible to retire pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 75522, but was eligible to retire pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 75522.5, shall, within 90 days after the judge’s death, provided that the death occurs prior to January 1, 2029, elect to receive either of the following:(1) A monthly retirement allowance equal to one-half of the judge’s benefit factor computed as stated in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 75522.5 as of the date of death, multiplied by the judge’s final compensation multiplied by the number of years of service credit. This allowance shall be adjusted for changes in the cost of living as provided in Section 75523.(2) The judge’s monetary credits determined pursuant to Section 75520, including the credits added under subdivision (b) of that section computed to the last day of the month preceding the date of distribution.(c) A surviving designated beneficiary spouse of a retired judge who elected to receive a monthly allowance under subdivision (d) of Section 75522 or who was retired for disability and receiving an allowance under Section 75560.4 shall receive a monthly allowance equal to 50 percent of the deceased judge’s unmodified monthly retirement allowance. This allowance shall be adjusted for changes in the cost of living as provided in Section 75523.(d) (1) A surviving designated beneficiary spouse of a retired judge who was receiving a retirement allowance under Section 75522.5 shall receive a monthly allowance equal to 50 percent of the deceased judge’s unmodified monthly retirement allowance. The surviving spouse’s allowance shall be adjusted for changes in the cost of living as provided in Section 75523.(2) A surviving designated beneficiary spouse of a judge who elected to retire and receive a retirement allowance under Section 75522.5, but who died before receiving the retirement allowance, shall receive a monthly allowance equal to 50 percent of the unmodified monthly retirement allowance the deceased judge would have received pursuant to Section 75522.5 had the judge been living and receiving the retirement allowance, beginning the date the judge would have been eligible to receive the benefits under Section 75522.5. This allowance shall be adjusted for changes in the cost of living in the same manner as provided in Section 75523.(e) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article to the contrary, the surviving designated beneficiary spouse of a judge who (A) died in office, (B) had attained the minimum age for service retirement applicable to the judge preceding their death, and (C) was eligible to receive an allowance pursuant to Section 75522 shall receive an allowance that is equal to the amount that the judge would have received if the judge had been retired from service on the date of death and had elected the optional settlement specified in subdivision (b) of Section 75571 or subdivision (b) of Section 75571.5, and in Section 75573. 75573, or the optional settlement specified in subdivision (c) of Section 75571.5.(2) A surviving designated beneficiary spouse receiving an allowance pursuant to this subdivision shall have no other claim to benefits with respect to the Judges’ Retirement Fund or with respect to any other provision of the Judges’ Retirement System II Law.(3) The benefits provided by this subdivision are only payable to the surviving designated beneficiary spouse of a judge who elects to come within this subdivision. That election may be made at any time while the judge is in office and, once made, the election is irrevocable.(f) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), a monthly allowance payable to a surviving designated beneficiary spouse pursuant to this section is payable commencing upon the death of the judge and continuing until the death of the surviving designated beneficiary. spouse.SEC. 7.SEC. 9. Section 75591 of the Government Code is amended to read:75591. (a) A surviving designated beneficiary spouse of a judge who dies before becoming eligible to retire pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 75522 shall receive the greater of one of the following:(1) The judge’s monetary credits determined pursuant to Section 75520, including the credits added under subdivision (b) of that section computed to the last day of the month preceding the date of distribution.(2) Three times the judge’s annual salary at the time of the judge’s death. The amount shall be paid in equal monthly installments for a period of 36 months.(b) If there is no surviving designated beneficiary, then spouse, the greater of the amounts prescribed in subdivision (a) shall be paid to the judge’s second designated beneficiary, or if none, to the judge’s estate.